Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5860.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21c. Property, except a casino, exempted under sections 20(1) and (2), 20a, and 20b that is located in a renaissance zone under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or a HOPE zone under the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act is exempt from the specific taxes levied under this act to the extent and for the duration provided pursuant to under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, or the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act, except for that portion of the specific tax levied under this act attributable to a special assessment or a tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. The specific tax calculated under this section shall must be disbursed proportionately to the local taxing unit or units that levied the special assessment or the tax described in section 7ff(2) or (9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7ff. As used in this section, "casino" means a casino or a parking lot, hotel, motel, or retail store owned or operated by a casino, an affiliate, or an affiliated company, regulated by this state pursuant to the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, the Initiated Law of 1996, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.216.432.226. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05500'25) or House Bill No. 5856 (request no. H05500'25).